Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 189 Traffic Regulations — Vehicle Equipment and Storage
189.230.
Reduction of load and speed limits — Fiscal court to require cooperative agreement of persons applying for permit under KRS 189.212.

Except as provided in KRS

189.221

(6),

189.222

, and

189.2226

, the department, in respect to state and federal highways, and county judges/executive in respect to county highways, may prescribe, by notice as provided in subsection (3) of this section, load and speed limits lower than the limits prescribed in KRS

189.221

and subsection (4) of KRS

189.390

, respectively, if in their judgment any highway may, by reason of its design, deterioration, rain, or other natural causes, be damaged or destroyed by motor trucks or semitrailer trucks, if their gross weight or speed exceeds certain limits. The department or fiscal court may, by like notice, regulate or prohibit the operation of motor trucks or semitrailer trucks on state highways or county roads for limited periods of specified days, or parts of days, if their load and speed exceed those limits, if in their judgment, the regulation or prohibition is necessary, by reason of traffic density or intensive use by the traveling public, to provide for the public safety and convenience on the highway.

The department, in respect to bridges on the extended weight coal haul system defined in KRS

177.9771

, may prescribe, by notice, as provided in subsection (3) of this section, gross weight limits lower than the limits prescribed in KRS

177.9771

, when in its judgment any bridge on the extended weight coal haul road system may, by reason of its design or deterioration, be damaged or destroyed to the point of catastrophic failure by motor vehicles, if their gross weight exceeds certain limits. For the purposes of KRS 177.9771, all bridges shall conform with KRS 177.9771(4)(a) to (d).

The notice or the substance of it shall be posted at conspicuous places at the termini of and at all intermediate crossroads and road junctions with the section of the highway to which the notice applies. After a notice has been posted, a person shall not operate any motor truck or semitrailer truck contrary to its provisions.

A fiscal court shall require all persons applying for a permit issued under KRS

189.212

to enter into a cooperative agreement with the fiscal court. The cooperative agreement shall provide for an equitable apportionment of the incremental costs for design, maintenance, construction, or reconstruction of those roads and bridges on which the person will be operating under the permit issued under KRS

189.212

. A fiscal court may require as part of a cooperative agreement for the person to give the fiscal court a bond to ensure payment of the equitable costs associated with the permit issued under KRS 189.212. All funds collected under this subsection shall be expended on those roads covered by the cooperative agreement.

A fiscal court shall not be relieved of expending its normal routine maintenance on all roads covered by cooperative agreements under the provisions of this section.

A person who entered a cooperative agreement with a fiscal court under the provisions of subsection (4) of this section may terminate the agreement by submitting written notice to the fiscal court. If a person terminates a cooperative agreement with a fiscal court, the permit issued under KRS

189.212

shall immediately be revoked by the fiscal court.

History.

2739g-91: amend. Acts 1958, ch. 126, § 23; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(1); 1978, ch. 384, § 335, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 498, § 5, effective April 1, 1987; 1992, ch. 143, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 484, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2003, ch. 124, § 37, effective June 24, 2003.

189.2301.
Axle weight exemption for vehicles on state-maintained AAA highways.

The provisions of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, a vehicle that has a valid registration of a declared gross vehicle weight, including any towed unit, of eighty thousand (80,000) pounds or less shall be exempt from any axle weight provisions when operating on any state-maintained highway that is classified as a “AAA” highway, if the vehicle is hauling seventy-nine thousand nine hundred ninety-nine (79,999) pounds or less. A person operating a vehicle under the provisions of this section shall have written documentation verifying the weight of the load being hauled is seventy-nine thousand nine hundred ninety-nine (79,999) pounds or less. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle operating on the interstate highway system or any vehicle operating on any highway where the vehicle would exceed any posted bridge weight limit.

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 157, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2017 ch. 174, § 4, effective April 10, 2017.

189.231.
State maintained highways — Restriction and regulation of traffic.

The secretary of transportation may install and maintain traffic control devices upon state-maintained highways in such manner as is reasonably necessary to promote the safety and convenience of the traveling public.

The driver of any vehicle shall obey the instructions of any official traffic control device applicable thereto unless otherwise directed by a traffic or police officer, subject to the exceptions granted the driver of an authorized emergency vehicle.

The secretary of transportation may restrict or regulate traffic upon state-maintained highways in such a manner as is reasonably necessary to promote the safety of the traveling public.

History.

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 206, § 1; 1966, ch. 255, § 178; 1988, ch. 347, § 1, effective April 10, 1988.

189.232.
Definition of “highway work zone.” [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 37, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; repealed by 2019 ch. 40, § 6, effective June 27, 2019.

189.2325.
Posting of signs advising motorists of increased traffic penalties in state highway work zones.

The secretary of the Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A governing the posting of signs advising motorists that penalties are increased for traffic violations occurring on state-maintained streets or state-maintained highways in a highway work zone. The administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet shall include guidelines to determine which areas are appropriate to the posting of these signs. The guidelines may include, but are not limited to, the following:

The duration of the work on the highway;

The proximity of workers to moving traffic;

The existence of any unusual or hazardous conditions;

The volume of traffic on the highway; and

Other appropriate factors as determined by the secretary.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 37, § 2, effective July 15, 1996.

189.2327.
Doubling of fines in highway work zone — Highway work zone safety fund.

Subject to the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, if a violation of KRS

189.290

to

189.580

or

189.910

to

189.960

occurred in a highway work zone, the fine established under KRS

189.394

,

189.990

, or

189.993

shall be doubled.

In order for a fine to be doubled under this section, the highway work zone must have:

Signs displayed informing drivers of the existence of a highway work zone and that fines are doubled in it; and

At least one (1) bona fide worker present.

All fines collected for violations in a highway work zone under subsection (1) of this section shall be deposited into a separate trust and agency account within the Transportation Cabinet known as the “highway work zone safety fund.” The highway work zone safety fund shall be used exclusively by the Transportation Cabinet to hire or pay for enhanced law enforcement of traffic laws within highway work zones.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 40, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

189.2329.
Prohibited conduct with respect to temporary traffic control devices in highway work zones — Penalty — Disposition of restitution payments.

A person shall not intentionally destroy, remove, injure, or deface a temporary traffic control device erected for the purpose of enhancing traffic safety or worker safety in a highway work zone. A temporary traffic control device shall include but not be limited to a cone, tubular marker, delineator, warning light, drum, barricade, sign, sign truck, arrow board, or other device specified in an approved traffic control plan or by an administrative regulation promulgated by the cabinet pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A.

A person who violates the provisions of this section shall, upon conviction, in addition to any other penalty established by statute, be sentenced to pay one hundred dollars ($100) for each temporary traffic control device that the person destroyed, removed, injured, or defaced, and the person shall make restitution to the owner of the temporary traffic control device.

Restitution payments to owners of temporary traffic control devices required to be made under subsection (2) of this section shall be paid directly to the owner of the device as specified by written order of the court. The court shall not direct that the payments be made through the circuit clerk.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 37, § 5, effective July 15, 1996; 2002, ch. 183, § 16, effective August 1, 2002; 2019 ch. 40, § 2, effective June 27, 2019.

189.233.
Regulation of traffic on state highways.

The secretary of transportation may, by official order, assume the responsibility for regulating traffic and parking on streets accepted as a part of the state highway system, and may contract with the city or a joint city-county agency for the performance of this function.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 35, § 1.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A city of the fourth class does not have the authority under KRS 86.110(11) (now repealed) to impose weight limits on a state highway if the commissioner of highways (now secretary of transportation) has assumed responsibility under this section for regulating traffic on the state maintained highways running through the city.

OAG 74-357

.

Charitable solicitors who are soliciting funds at a main intersection within a city limits are in the same class as peddlers and hawkers as far as the authority of a city to regulate the use of its streets is concerned, but unless a city has adopted an ordinance either prohibiting or regulating these street solicitors, specific permission for the soliciting is not required.

OAG 76-177

.

The city may regulate traffic on a city street, even though that street is part of a state highway, maintained by the state, unless the state highway commissioner (now secretary of transportation) has by official order assumed the responsibility of the regulation of traffic on that street pursuant to this section and in the absence of the above-mentioned order, the city, pursuant to its control of the city streets, may regulate parking, install parking meters and enforce parking violations through the enactment of reasonable ordinances, including the towing away of vehicles.

OAG 78-259

.

189.235.
Increase of height, weight and length limits for trucks and semitrailer trucks on certain designated highways — Maximum limits. [Repealed.]

189.240.
Weighing — Unloading part of load. [Repealed.]

189.250.
Scales for weighing motor vehicles. [Repealed.]

189.260.
Display of plates by commercial vehicles — Registration to be kept in truck.

Every motor vehicle licensed under KRS 186.050(3) through (14) shall display all plates issued by the county clerk. Except as provided in KRS

186.045

, the registration receipt shall be kept in the truck at all times and shall be available for inspection.

History.

2739g-32: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 15, § 5; 1958, ch. 82, § 9; 1964, ch. 95, § 4; 1966, ch. 139, § 25; 1966, ch. 255, § 179; 1976, ch. 133, § 16.

189.265.
Motor buses — Height, length and weight limits on designated highways.

“Motor bus” shall mean any motor vehicle designed primarily for the transportation of passengers and having a seating capacity in excess of nine (9) passengers including the driver, provided, however, that transit authorities created pursuant to KRS Chapter 96A are exempt from the provisions of this section.

No person shall operate on any highway, except such highways as may be designated by the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, any motor bus which exceeds, including any part of the body or load, eleven (11) feet six (6) inches in height, forty (40) feet in length, twenty (20) tons in gross weight, or ninety-six (96) inches in width, exclusive of any required safety equipment.

The secretary of the Transportation Cabinet, in respect to highways which are a part of the state-maintained system, by official order may increase the maximum height of a motor bus to twelve (12) feet six (6) inches and the maximum width of a motor bus to 102 inches, exclusive of any required safety equipment and tire bulge due to loads, if in the opinion of the secretary the increased height and width designated by him is justified by the width of such highways, provided, however, that any such increase in the width of motor buses or designation of highways to be used by them shall not, in any way, exceed the federal law or regulations thereunder or jeopardize the allotment or qualification for federal aid funds of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 139, § 1; 1980, ch. 324, § 7, effective July 15, 1980.

189.269.
Prohibition on new overweight or overdimensional permits — Exception.

After June 27, 2019, no new overweight or overdimensional permit, or any new overweight or overdimensional tolerance, for motor carriers shall be granted under this chapter, except that the overweight permit established in KRS

177.985

and

177.986

may be extended until June 30, 2033.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 126, § 4, effective June 27, 2019.

189.270.
Special permits to exceed limits.

The department may issue permits for the operation of motor vehicles, manufactured homes, recreational vehicles, boats, or any other vehicle transporting a nondivisible load, whose gross weight including load, height, width, or length exceeds the limits prescribed by this chapter or which in other respects fail to comply with the requirements of this chapter. Permits may be issued by the department for stated periods, special purposes, and unusual conditions, and upon terms in the interest of public safety and the preservation of the highways as the department may require.

Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, the department may, at the request of an applicant, issue a single-trip permit regardless of the type of vehicle or equipment being transported that exceeds the weight or dimension limits established by this chapter if the load being transported is a nondivisible load. A single-trip permit shall cost sixty dollars ($60) for each overweight or overdimensional permit requested.

Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, the department may, at the request of an applicant, issue an annual permit regardless of the type of vehicle or equipment being transported that exceeds the weight or dimension limits established by this chapter if the load being transported is a nondivisible load.

The vehicle operating under a permit issued under this subsection shall not exceed sixteen (16) feet in width exclusive of usual and ordinary overhang, one hundred twenty (120) feet in length including a towing vehicle and trailer combination, thirteen (13) feet six (6) inches in height, or one hundred sixty thousand (160,000) pounds.

Except as provided in subsections (4), (7), and (8) of this section, an annual permit for loads less than or equal to fourteen (14) feet in width shall cost two hundred fifty dollars ($250). An annual permit for loads exceeding fourteen (14) feet in width shall cost five hundred dollars ($500).

An annual permit to transport farm equipment less than fourteen (14) feet in width shall cost eighty dollars ($80). An annual permit to transport farm equipment that exceeds fourteen (14) feet in width from a dealership to a farm, from a farm to a dealership, or from a dealership to a dealership shall cost one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

Permits issued under this section shall be for nondivisible loads and shall be valid statewide; however, the department may, as a condition of issuing an annual or single-trip permit, limit the overweight or overdimensional vehicle to specified routes, exclude certain highways, or even cancel an applicant’s permit if an unreasonable risk of accident or an unreasonable impedance of the flow of traffic would result from the presence of the overweight or overdimensional vehicle. A person who applies for, and accepts, a permit issued under this section is acknowledging that the Kentucky Transportation Cabinet is not guaranteeing safe passage of vehicles by issuing the permit. A person who applies for, and accepts, a permit issued under this section agrees to measure all clearances of highway structures, both laterally and vertically, prior to passage of the person’s vehicles along the routes specified in the permit. A person who applies for, and accepts, a permit issued under this section is classified as a bare licensee whose duty is to assume sole risk involved in using Kentucky’s highways without warranty of accuracy.

Subject to the limitations of subsection (12) of this section, the department shall promulgate administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A to establish requirements for escort vehicles, safety markings, and other safety restrictions governing the operation of an overweight or overdimensional vehicle. The department shall provide each applicant for an annual or single-trip permit issued under this section a copy of all restrictions associated with the overweight or overdimensional permit at no charge to the applicant. The department shall be prohibited from raising the permit fee established in subsections (2) and (3) of this section by levying additional fees for an overweight or overdimensional permit through the administrative regulation process.

Notwithstanding KRS

189.269

, the department may, at the request of an applicant who is a transporter of manufactured housing, issue an annual permit that exceeds the weight or dimension limits established by this chapter if the load being transported is a nondivisible load.

The vehicle operated shall not exceed sixteen (16) feet in width exclusive of usual and ordinary overhang, one hundred twenty (120) feet in length including a towing vehicle and trailer combination, fifteen (15) feet in height, or one hundred sixty thousand (160,000) pounds.

The cost for an annual permit issued under this subsection shall be:

One thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) for loads greater than fourteen (14) feet in width or greater than thirteen (13) feet six (6) inches in height; and

Five hundred dollars ($500) for loads less than or equal to fourteen (14) feet in width and less than or equal to thirteen (13) feet six (6) inches in height.

The holder of a permit issued under this subsection shall, when transporting a manufactured home:

Abide by all escort requirements, safety markings, and other safety restrictions governing overweight and overdimensional vehicles; and

Equip each truck operating under a permit with global positioning system technology that keeps a record of locations traveled. The travel records of trucks operating under a permit shall be open to inspection by the Transportation Cabinet.

Any person with a permit under this subsection who operates a vehicle greater than thirteen (13) feet six (6) inches in height while operating in a restricted area designated by the Transportation Cabinet shall be fined one thousand dollars ($1,000).

The cabinet shall not issue an annual permit under this section if the person applying for the permit is eligible for an annual permit issued under KRS

189.2716

or

189.2717

.

The department may require the applicant to give bond, with approved surety, to indemnify the state or counties against damage to highways or bridges resulting from use by the applicant. The operation of vehicles in accordance with the terms of the permit issued under this section shall not constitute a violation of this chapter if the operator has the permit, or an authenticated copy of it, in his possession.

Any person transporting a parade float which exceeds the dimensional limits on a highway over which it is transported shall be required to obtain a permit as required in subsection (2) of this section. If the float is being used in conjunction with a parade to be held within the boundaries of the Commonwealth, a fee shall not be assessed by the department to issue the permit.

A person shall not operate any vehicle in violation of the terms of the permit issued under this section.

The cabinet shall not promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to this section that restrict the time or days of the week when a permit holder may operate on the highway, except that travel may be limited from 6 a.m. to 9 a.m. and 3 p.m. to 6 p.m. Monday through Friday. In addition to the restrictions established in this paragraph, any manufactured home being transported by permit issued under this section shall not travel on any highway after daylight hours Monday through Saturday, or at any time on Sunday.

The cabinet shall allow a permit holder who has obtained a permit to transport equipment to a work site to return to the permit holder’s place of business immediately after work is completed at the job site, subject to the limitations of paragraph (a) of this subsection.

The cabinet shall not promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to this section setting forth escort vehicle requirements for overdimensional farm implements or vehicles towing overdimensional farm implements that are more stringent than the following:

For a single vehicle and load in excess of twelve (12) feet in width being operated on a two (2) lane highway, no more than one (1) lead vehicle shall be required;

For a single vehicle and load in excess of twelve (12) feet in width being operated on a four (4) lane highway, no more than one (1) trail vehicle shall be required;

For a single vehicle and load in excess of eighty-five (85) feet in length being operated on a two (2) lane highway, no more than one (1) lead vehicle shall be required;

For more than one (1) vehicle and load in excess of twelve (12) feet in width or eighty-five (85) feet in length being operated as a convoy on a two (2) lane highway, no more than one (1) lead vehicle shall be required;

A lead escort vehicle on a two (2) lane highway under this paragraph may also serve as a tow vehicle;

Any distance for lead or trail escort vehicles shall contain provisions allowing for a variance from that distance due to safety or road conditions; and

A vehicle or its escort shall be required to bear a sign declaring that the vehicle is oversized or be required to use lights, flashers, or flags, but a vehicle or its escort shall not be required to do both.

History.

2739g-92: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 118, § 1(c); 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(1); 1976, ch. 173, § 3; 1982, ch. 265, § 3, effective April 1, 1982; 1982, ch. 395, § 20, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 150, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 126, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1988, ch. 175, § 11, effective July 15, 1988; 1988, ch. 245, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 77, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 197, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 269, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 292, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 22, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 283, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 400, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 42, § 7, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 356, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 306, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2003, ch. 30, § 2, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 166, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2011, ch. 88, § 4, effective March 16, 2011; 2012, ch. 114, § 2, effective April 11, 2012; 2016 ch. 63, § 2, effective July 15, 2016; 2020 ch. 19, § 1, effective July 15, 2020.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2017).
2017 Ky. Acts Ch. 146, sec. 11 repealed KRS

189.2715

, which was cited in
KRS

189.270

(7). However, no conforming amendment of
KRS

189.270

was included in
2017 Ky. Acts ch. 146 to remove the reference to the repealed section. The Reviser of Statutes has made this conforming change under the authority of
KRS

7.136

.

189.271.
Special permits for hauling industrial materials — Renewals — Overweight and overdimensional vehicles.

Notwithstanding any other provision of laws, the Transportation Cabinet may issue special permits to the owners, operators, or lessees of motor vehicles for the purpose of hauling industrial materials whose gross weight or dimensions, including vehicle and load, exceeds the limits prescribed by this chapter or which in other respects fail to comply with the requirements of this chapter. A separate permit shall be required for each vehicle. Such permits shall be issued for specified materials only and shall designate the portions of the state primary road system over which such vehicle may operate pursuant to the permit. Such permit shall be issued for a stated period of time determined by the applicant not to exceed three (3) years, and an existing permit may be renewed pending an inspection by the cabinet of the routes listed on the permit. Permits under this section shall be upon such terms and conditions as the cabinet may, in its discretion, require in the public interest.

The cabinet may establish a system by which a current permit holder can be granted a new permit specifying different routes or materials without having to complete a new application or pay a separate application fee.

The cabinet shall require, as a condition to the issuance of the permit, that the applicant pay a reasonable fee, to be fixed by the cabinet, and shall require that an applicant convicted under provisions of KRS 189.990(2)(a) two (2) or more times within a five (5) year period give bond, with approved surety, in an amount not to exceed six thousand dollars ($6,000) for each vehicle to indemnify the Commonwealth of Kentucky against damage to highways or bridges resulting from the operation of any motor vehicle under the authorization of such permit. A bond acquired under this subsection may be carried forward to another permit if the cabinet has not gone against the bond.

The operation of any motor vehicle in accordance with the terms of any such permit shall not constitute a violation of this chapter, if the operator has the permit, or a copy of it, authenticated as the cabinet may require, in his possession.

The cabinet shall not issue a permit under this section for a vehicle whose gross weight, including vehicle and load, exceeds the maximum gross weight as provided in KRS

189.222

.

The cabinet shall not issue a permit under this section for a vehicle whose dimensions, including vehicle and load, exceed the maximum dimension as provided in KRS

189.222

.

A person shall not operate a motor vehicle in violation of the terms and conditions of any permit issued by the cabinet pursuant to this section.

As used in this section, industrial materials shall mean all cargo, whether divisible or indivisible, which a motor vehicle transports in the usual and ordinary course of business and shall specifically include, but not be limited to, agricultural products, minerals, or natural resources transported by a motor vehicle.

The cabinet may:

Exercise general supervision of the administering and enforcement of this section.

Promulgate administrative regulations, subject to the limitations of this section, with respect to the issuance of a permit, including, but not limited to, administrative regulations concerning the duration of permits and weight limits for various types of vehicles, materials, and highways.

Promulgate administrative regulations with respect to the amount, terms and conditions of the bond and the sufficiency of the surety of such bond required by this section. The cabinet shall allow applicants not required to post a surety bond under subsection (3) of this section to self-insure to meet the bonding requirements of this section.

Issue, continue in effect, revoke, modify, or deny, under such conditions as the cabinet may prescribe, permits provided for under this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 258, § 4; 1978, ch. 232, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1994, ch. 132, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 481, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Since the General Assembly did not intend to confer general authority to require a bond for the privilege of operating vehicles within statutory limits, any attempt by a county to require a bond of persons operating within statutory limits as well as for holders of special permits is in conflict with and beyond the scope of the home rule statute (KRS

67.083

).

OAG 75-183

.

189.2713.
Annual and single-trip permits for transporting loads of metal commodities weighing between 80,001 and 120,000 pounds — Administrative regulations.

As used in this section, “metal commodities” means output products from metal-producing industries that are transported in their most basic and original form from a mill or storage facility to market for processing. “Metal commodities” does not include manufactured parts being transported from a manufacturer or supplier to another customer.

The department shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A governing the issuance of annual and single-trip permits for the operation of motor vehicles transporting metal commodities with a minimum gross weight of eighty thousand and one (80,001) pounds and a maximum gross weight of one hundred twenty thousand (120,000) pounds in divisible or nondivisible loads to or from a facility manufacturing metal commodities in this state or a facility used for storage of metal commodities.

A motor carrier transporting metal commodities in divisible or nondivisible loads to or from a facility manufacturing metal commodities in this state or a facility used for storage of metal commodities, may apply for an annual or single-trip overweight permit pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. A permit issued under this section shall be specific to a single truck and shall be valid twenty-four (24) hours a day.

The cost of an annual permit issued under this section shall be one thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($1,250).

The cost of a single-trip permit issued under this section shall be one hundred dollars ($100).

Permits issued under this section shall contain a Web site hyperlink or any other method to provide the motor carrier with routes that are approved by the department.

Upon renewal of any annual permit issued under this section, the permit holder shall report to the cabinet the number of trips made and the total miles driven under the permit during the previous year.

Administrative regulations promulgated by the department under this section may require motor carriers to meet specific Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration (FMCSA) safety ratings and FMCSA safety measurement system scores before issuance of a permit under this section.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 146, § 1, effective June 29, 2017; 2019 ch. 126, § 3, effective June 27, 2019.

189.2714.
Annual overweight permit for transporting steel products or materials to or from a manufacturing or storage facility — Administrative regulations. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 146, § 2, effective July 1, 2020; Repealed 2019, ch. 126, § 6, effective June 27, 2019.

189.2715.
Annual overweight permit for transporting steel products or materials — Weight and mileage limitations. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 94, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 2012, ch. 112, § 1, effective July 12, 2012; Repealed, Acts 2017, ch. 146, § 11, effective June 29, 2017.

189.2716.
Annual overdimensional permit for transporting steel products to a Kentucky riverport — Width and mileage limitations.

As used in this section, “riverport” means a riverport facility established by a riverport authority under KRS

65.520

.

In order to promote economic development and retain jobs within this state, subject to KRS

189.222

, the department shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A governing the issue of annual permits for the operation of motor vehicles that are transporting steel products in divisible or nondivisible loads on state highways from a facility manufacturing products in this state to a riverport within this state, and whose dimensions exceed the limits for vehicle width prescribed by this chapter.

The maximum width dimension for an overdimensional permit issued in accordance with this section shall be ten (10) feet.

A motor carrier transporting steel products in divisible or nondivisible loads from a facility manufacturing steel products in this state may apply for an annual overdimensional permit pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. An application for a permit shall identify the route to be used. The permit shall be valid twenty-four (24) hours a day, but shall be limited to movements of steel products within the state of not more than seven (7) road miles from the manufacturing facility. The cost of the annual permit shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

HISTORY:

2016 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 15, 2016.

189.2717.
Annual overweight permit for transporting nondivisible loads over specified routes — Axle-weight limitation.

Subject to the provisions of KRS

189.222

, the department may promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A governing the issuance of annual permits for the operation of motor vehicles transporting nondivisible loads in this Commonwealth whose gross weight exceeds the limits prescribed by this chapter. The gross weight of a motor vehicle operating pursuant to this section shall not exceed one hundred twenty thousand (120,000) pounds. The movement of the overweight motor vehicle shall be limited to a specific route set forth on the annual permit.

The following axle weights shall not be exceeded in the loading of a nondivisible load:

Single axle with axles less than forty-two (42) inches apart and being the steering axle with one (1) wheel on each side of the axle to be considered a single axle shall not be more than fifteen thousand (15,000) pounds;

Two (2) axles in tandem arrangement which are spaced forty-two (42) inches or more apart and less than ninety-six (96) inches apart shall not be more than forty thousand (40,000) pounds;

Three (3) axles in tridem arrangement which are spaced forty-two (42) or more inches apart and less than one hundred twenty (120) inches apart shall not be more than sixty-five thousand (65,000) pounds; and

Dual wheel axle with one (1) axle with two (2) wheels on each side of the axle to be considered a dual wheel axle shall not be more than twenty thousand (20,000) pounds each.

Each motor vehicle operating pursuant to this section shall comply with the safety provisions set forth in the administrative regulations promulgated by the department pursuant to this section.

The fee for the annual permit for each motor vehicle pursuant to this section shall be five hundred dollars ($500).

The department may refuse to issue a permit for a requested route because of the inadequacies of the roadway or a structure on that route.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 52, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 306, § 2, effective July 15, 1998.

189.2718.
Administrative regulations regarding issuance of annual certificates for transporting feed for livestock or poultry to a farm or other facility housing livestock or poultry.

The department may promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A governing the issuance of annual certificates for the operation of motor vehicles exclusively engaged in transporting feed for livestock or poultry to a farm or other facility housing livestock or poultry.

A motor carrier exclusively engaged in transporting feed for livestock or poultry in divisible or nondivisible loads may apply for an annual certificate pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. A certificate issued under this section shall be:

Specific to a single truck;

Valid twenty-four (24) hours a day; and

Kept in the vehicle during all times of operation.

The cost of an annual certificate issued under this section shall be one hundred fifty dollars ($150), paid to the cabinet.

Administrative regulations promulgated by the department under this section may require motor carriers to meet specific Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration (FMCSA) safety ratings and FMCSA safety measurement system scores before issuance of a certificate under this section.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 175, § 1, effective July 14, 2018.

189.272.
Venue and jurisdiction — Overweight vehicle cases.

The District Court where the offense occurred shall have venue and jurisdiction with the courts of this Commonwealth of all prosecutions for violations of the weight provisions of KRS

189.221

,

189.222

,

189.226

,

189.230

,

189.270

and

189.271

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 258, § 3.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Notes, Economic, Social and Legal Aspects of Coal Transportation in Kentucky,
64 Ky. L.J. 601 (1975-76).

189.273.
Permit for transportation of soil conservation and other specialized equipment — Escort vehicles. [Repealed.]

189.274.
Special permits for moving specialized equipment. [Repealed.]

189.275.
Housetrailers, dimensions — Permit required, when. [Repealed.]

189.276.
Issuance of resource recovery road hauling permit — Terms and conditions — Fee. [Repealed.]

189.277.
Forms for use of permit — Review by department of revenue. [Repealed.]

189.280.
Trucks and trailers owned by governmental units — Regulation of trucks and trailers by cities.

KRS

189.221

to

189.230

and

189.280

shall not apply to motor trucks, semitrailer trucks, or trailers owned by the United States, the Commonwealth of Kentucky, or any agency of them, any county or city.

If any motor truck, semitrailer truck, or trailer is lawfully licensed by a city pursuant to KRS

186.270

, then KRS

189.221

and subsection (1) of

189.222

shall not apply thereto, within the limits of the city issuing the license, or within fifteen (15) miles of the limits of the city, except on such state-maintained highways or portions thereof, including connecting-link streets, as may be designated by the commissioner of highways, and on such county highways as may be designated by the county judge/executive; provided, however, that in no case shall any vehicle exceed the weight and size limitations established by the city ordinance when those limitations are less stringent than those provided in the aforementioned sections of the statutes. For the purposes of this subsection vehicles exempt from the imposition of a city license tax by reason of subsection (2) of KRS

281.830

shall be entitled to the same exemptions as those so licensed.

Cities may, by ordinance, provide maximum limits with respect to the weight, height, width and length of motor trucks, semitrailer trucks, and trailers on city-owned and maintained streets and roads within their respective boundaries.

HISTORY:

2739g-92: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 118, 1(a)(b)1952, ch. 177; 1966, ch. 255, § 180; 2006, ch. 173, § 30, effective July 12, 2006; 2014, ch. 92, § 267, effective January 1, 2015; 2022 ch. 153, § 6, effective July 14, 2022.